District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.16

Candidate’s liability for financial obligation incurred by a committee.

No provision of this part shall be construed as creating liability on the part of any candidate for any financial obligation incurred by a committee. For the purposes of this part, and subchapter I of Chapter 10 of this title [§ 1-1001.01 et seq.], actions of an agent acting for a candidate shall be imputed to the candidate; provided, that the actions of the agent may not be imputed to the candidate in the presence of a provision of law requiring a willful and knowing violation of this part or subchapter I of Chapter 10 of this title [§ 1-1001.01 et seq.], unless the agency relationship to engage in the act is shown by clear and convincing evidence.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 316, 59 DCR 1862